Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 70-2101 to 70-2105 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Power Infrastructure Protection Act.

Laws 2009, LB238, § 3.